Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 9-108, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 9-108. The board of education of any school district
furnishing transportation is hereby authorized to furnish, in
addition to free transportation to and from school, transportation
within or without the district, within or outside of this state, for
children attending the schools of that district, for the purpose of
attending cocurricular and extracurricular activities. Two or more
districts may enter into agreements for the furnishing of such
transportation. The expense of any such additional transportation
Req. No. 15671 Page 1

shal l be paid by the children so transported, by the school activity
or school organization receiving benefit from such transportation,
or from other private sources the school district unless the
cocurricular or extracurricular activity is sanctioned by the
Oklahoma Secondary School Activity Association (OSSAA), in which
case, the OSSAA shall pay the additional transportation expenses.
Money so collected from the OSSAA pursuant to this section shall not
be chargeable to or become a part of the school district's finances.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15671 SW 12/12/25









Req. No. 15671 Page 2